District of Columbia statutes.
42-3113

Interpretation.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in accordance with its remedial purposes. The definition of a drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance shall not be subject to any restrictions or limitations upon public or private nuisance actions at common law. This action is civil in nature and none of its provisions should be interpreted as punishment.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 14, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591
1981 Ed., § 45-3313.
D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.